Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5901
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-5901 to 77-5908 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 66;

Laws 2009, LB403, § 14.